Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 3. Diabetes Care Planning

Effective dates. —

Laws 2014, ch. 67, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2014.

§ 35-25-301.
Diabetes care planning; reports to the legislature.

The department of health shall develop a plan to reduce the incidence of diabetes in Wyoming, improve diabetes care, and control complications associated with diabetes. The plan shall include identification of goals and benchmarks. The department shall submit the plan to the joint labor, health and social services interim committee by October 1, 2014.

The department of health shall track for statistical and trending analysis the following:

The prevalence of all types of diabetes in the state and the financial impact that diabetes is having on the state. Items included in this assessment shall include the number of individuals with diabetes, the number of individuals with diabetes and family members impacted by prevention and diabetes control programs implemented by the department, the financial toll or impact diabetes and its complications place on the Medicaid program and the financial toll or impact diabetes and its complications place on the Medicaid program in comparison to other chronic diseases and conditions;

An assessment of the benefits of implemented programs and activities aimed at controlling diabetes and preventing the disease;

A description of the level of coordination existing between the department, other agencies and Eastern Shoshone and Northern Arapaho tribes on activities, programmatic activities and messaging on managing, treating or preventing all forms of diabetes and its complications;

Detailed action plans for battling diabetes with a range of actionable items for consideration by the legislature. The plans shall identify proposed action steps to reduce the impact of diabetes, prediabetes and related diabetes complications. The plan shall also identify expected outcomes of the action steps proposed in the following biennium while also establishing benchmarks for controlling and preventing relevant forms of diabetes; and

The impact of gestational diabetes on the Medicaid population, including an analysis of cost implications, the number of pregnant women screened and diagnosed and patient outcome measures and recommended strategies to reduce the impact of the condition and to improve outcomes for this population;

The development of a detailed budget blueprint identifying needs, costs and resources required to implement the plan developed pursuant to this section. The blueprint shall include a budget range for all options presented in the plan for consideration by the legislature.

History.

2014 ch. 67, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2015 ch. 59, § 1, effective February 26, 2015; 2022 ch. 82, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2015 amendment,

in the introductory language of (b), substituted “track for statistical and trending analysis” for “submit a report to the joint labor, health and social services interim committee by October 1 of each odd-numbered year through 2021 on.”

Laws 2015, ch. 59, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2015.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, in (b)(iii), added “Eastern” preceding “Shoshone” and “Northern” preceding “Arapaho.”